Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1301.04
Venue; crime committed using an electronic communication device.

(1) If a person uses an electronic communication device to commit any element of an offense, such person may be tried in the county where the electronic communication was initiated or where the electronic communication was received.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Electronic communication has the same meaning as in section 28-1310; and

(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in section 28-833.

Laws 2021, LB500, § 2.